errortag-src/adj-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     North Sámi adjective lexicon                           !
! ========================================================================== !


! Some adjectival lexica, the main part of them is found in the
! file sme-lex.txt

LEXICON LEXATTR  ! This lexicon is here to give the tags to the compounding
+A+Attr:%> ATTR ; ! attributive forms.

LEXICON At !NB Have commented out everything except K ; here to avoid strange
          ! compounds like -šlailágán etc. Attr. that can be compounded with
          ! NAMAT etc are redirected to LEXATTR
+A+Attr:%> K ;
+A+Attr:%>%- RAbbr ;
!+A+Attr-:#%- ProperNoun ;   ! Compounds
!+A+Attr:# AGADJECT ;
!+A+Attr+lágan:lágan LAGAN ; ! Derivation !tentative !
!+A+Attr:# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
!+A+Attr:# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj !^C^


LEXICON FINJU- !compounds only
+A+Attr:%> Rreal ; 
+A+Attr:» NAMAT ;



LEXICON ALIT 								   !^C^
! Both second-part compound and independent adj!^C^
! čáhppesalit bábir							   !^C^
! alit bábir								   !^C^
alit+Use/Circ:alih BEAKKAN ;   ! blue				   !
ruoksat+Use/Circ:ruoks VIELG ; ! red					   !
háváš+Use/Circ:háváž BEAKKAN ; ! -times				   !
stábat+Use/Circ:stábag AGAdj ; !						   !

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
bonju FINJU- ;
finju FINJU- ;
vinju FINJU- ;
dulve FINJU- ;
boaitto FINJU- ;
boaittu FINJU- ;
oapme FINJU- ;
boahkke FINJU- ;
streaŋga FINJU- ;
stuor FINJU- ;
čuorri FINJU- ;
čavde FINJU- ;
goike FINJU- ;
stuorra FINJU- ;
lagas At ;
soft-gun:soft-gun9 At ;
boastto FINJU- ; ! Nielsen says: "bare attr."
boasttu FINJU- ; ! Nielsen says: "bare attr."
vealu FINJU- ;
njagu FINJU- ;
vealu+Use/Sub:vealu LEXATTR; !
boastto+Use/Sub:boastto LEXATTR; !
boasttu+Use/Sub:boasttu LEXATTR; !
jorggu+Use/Sub:jorggu LEXATTR; !
jorggo+Use/Sub:jorggo LEXATTR; !
bonju+Use/Sub:bonju LEXATTR; !
doaibmi LEXATTR ;
eaŋgas LEXATTR ;
boranis LEXATTR ;
guolle#boranis LEXATTR ;
sihkar:sihkaris LEXATTR ;
bahá+Use/NG:bahá LEXATTR ;  ! This one is for "bahá vuoiŋŋat"
lága#vuosttas LEXATTR ; !'lovstridig'
čuorre FINJU- ;
ovddaldus FINJU- ;
maŋildus FINJU- ;
moju FINJU- ;
gomu FINJU- ;
veaitu FINJU- ;
gávu FINJU- ;
áidna At ;
ruosti At ;
čuvges#runta:čuvges#runta LEXATTR ;
botká LEXATTR ;
botká FINJU- ;
čáppis:čába LEXATTR ;
doanda LEXATTR ;
ávda LEXATTR ;
oaivvesnaga At ;
dánska-norgga LEXATTR ;
buiga LEXATTR ;
máilmme#loga+Use/Sub:máilmme#loga LEXATTR; !
máilmmi#loga LEXATTR ;
streaŋga LEXATTR ;
eaitnaha LEXATTR ;
jeagelha LEXATTR ;
gahperha LEXATTR ;
herveja LEXATTR ;
historjá-bio^grafiija LEXATTR ;
fáhkka LEXATTR ;
fálska LEXATTR ;
dánska LEXATTR ;
fránska LEXATTR ;
ránska LEXATTR ;
ruošša At ;
endena LEXATTR ;
ráhpat:ráhpa LEXATTR ;
sierra LEXATTR ;
árrat:árra LEXATTR ;
fásta LEXATTR ;
gaskan#šatta LEXATTR ;
sieiva LEXATTR ;
runta LEXATTR ;
čavde FINJU- ;
boagge FINJU- ;
njuogge FINJU- ;
liige FINJU- ;
boahkke FINJU- ;
oapme FINJU- ;
heamse FINJU- ;
dulve FINJU- ;
fleksi+Use/Sub:fleksi LEXATTR; !
vearri+Use/Sub:vearri LEXATTR; !
bajit#dási LEXATTR ;
suoma#giel At ;
ruoŧa#giel At ;
sáme#giel At ;
vierro#giel At ;
dáro#giel At ;
amas#giel At ;
unnit#logo#giel At ;
eanet#logo#giel At ;
eanet#logu#giel At ;
unnit#logu#giel At ;
vieris#giel At ;
vierro#giel At ;
vuosttas#giel At ;
vuosttaš#giel At ;
vuođđo#giel At ;
čállin#giel At ;
vuođđo#suoma#giel At ;
vuođđo#sáme#giel At ;
vuođđo#urála#giel At ;
vádja#giel At ;
váldo#giel At ;
áhkkil#sáme#giel At ;
uŋgár#giel At ;
uŋgára#giel At ;
veahádat#giel At ;
vepse#giel At ;
thai#giel At ;
ubme#sáme#giel At ;
ubmi#sáme#giel At ;
umát#sáme#giel At ;
tuiskka#giel At ;
turkka#giel At ;
albania#giel At ;
anáraš#giel At ;
bihton#sáme#giel At ;
bihtán#sáme#giel At ;
boares#dáro#giel At ;
báhcahat#giel At ;
cymru#giel At ;
darjje#sáme#giel At ;
davvi#sáme#giel At ;
diplomáhta#giel At ;
dološ#dáro#giel At ;
dološ#ruoŧa#giel At ;
duiskka#giel At ;
duortnus#sáme#giel At ;
dánskka#giel At ;
eatni#giel At ;
eaŋgalas#giel At ;
eaŋgals#giel At ;
ebre'a#giella:ebre'7a#giel At ;
e^spánnja#giel At ;
estte#giel At ;
eŋgelas#giel At ;
feara#giel At ;
fránskka#giel At ;
fuolke#giel At ;
fága#giel At ;
gaelik#giella:gaelik9#giel At ;
gieldda#sáme#giel At ;
gievkan#giel At ;
girje#giel At ;
godde#giel At ;
golle#giel At ;
goltá#giel At ;
greikka#giel At ;
gárjil#giel At ;
hebrea#giel At ;
hollándda#giel At ;
hupman#giel At ;
hálddašan#giel At ;
hállan#giel At ;
iirra#giel At ;
irlándda#giel At ;
islándda#giel At ;
itália#giel At ;
julev#sáme#giel At ;
julevu#sáme#giel At ;
juliv#giel At ;
juolge#giel At ;
jávohis#giel At ;
kataluniija#giel At ;
kaurna#giel At ;
kvena#giel At ;
kymri#giel At ;
latiinna#giel At ;
li^etuva#giel At ;
liivve#giel At ;
lulli#sáme#giel At ;
lyde#giel At ;
láhten#giel At ;
manjsi#giella:manj9si#giel At ;
ma^ori#giel At ;
mari#giel At ;
mearka#giel At ;
minoritehta#giel At ;
mordva#giel At ;
mátta#sáme#giel At ;
njenec#giel At ;
njeneca#giel At ;
nubbe#giel At ;
nubbin#giel At ;
nuortalaš#giel At ;
oahpahus#giel At ;
oarje#sáme#giel At ;
oarjel#sáme#giel At ;
orjjel#sáme#giel At ;
orjješ#sáme#giel At ;
ođđa#dáro#giel At ;
riikka#giel At ;
rumaš#giel At ;
ruošša#giel At ;
seava#giel At ;
bázahaddan At ;
ovdal#áiggi#riegádan At ;
bárte#oadjuduvvon At ;
áidno#riegádan At ;
vuordnása#dahkan At ;
bázahallan At ;
eami#álbmot#válljen+Use/Sub:eami#álbmot#válljen At; !
eami#álbmot#válljejuvvon+Use/Sub:eami#álbmot#válljejuvvon At; !
áivan LEXATTR ;
alpin LEXATTR ;
ieš#nammaduvvon At ;
bealle#dahkkon At ;
bealle#gárvves LEXATTR ;
ieš#ráhkaduvvon+Use/Sub:ieš#ráhkaduvvon At; !
doaibma#hehttejuvvon At ;
ovttastuvvon At ;
šiehpun LEXATTR ;
buollán At ;
dulán LEXATTR ;
ceakko FINJU- ;
dihto LEXATTR ;
áhppar LEXATTR ;
harbmadas LEXATTR ;
accagas+Use/Sub:accagas LEXATTR; !
bálddalas LEXATTR ;
báldalas LEXATTR ;
eaŋgalas LEXATTR ;
seahkalas LEXATTR ;
beallalas LEXATTR ;
sullalas LEXATTR ;
buohtalas LEXATTR ;
eŋgelas LEXATTR ;
rohkkolas LEXATTR ;
vurrolas LEXATTR ;
murtolas LEXATTR ;
sealggálas LEXATTR ;
čiergálas LEXATTR ;
rádjálas LEXATTR ;
ceahkkálas LEXATTR ;
lahkkálas LEXATTR ;
siskálas LEXATTR ;
čeahpálas LEXATTR ;
dássálas LEXATTR ;
searválas LEXATTR ;
geahčálas LEXATTR ;
sierranas LEXATTR ;
noaiddes LEXATTR ;
rahkat:rahkkes LEXATTR ;
lohtat:lohttes LEXATTR ;
eatnan#vuoles LEXATTR ;
náitalgeahtes LEXATTR ;
váhnengeahtes LEXATTR ;
biehtalkeahtes LEXATTR ;
boatkkakeahtes LEXATTR ;
namakeahtes LEXATTR ;
sivakeahtes LEXATTR ;
gilvvakeahtes LEXATTR ;
sánekeahtes LEXATTR ;
muhtehahtekeahtes LEXATTR ;
jeagelkeahtes LEXATTR ;
huksenkeahtes LEXATTR ;
njoalokeahtes LEXATTR ;
dásse#deattokeahtes LEXATTR ;
mohtorkeahtes LEXATTR ;
boađuskeahtes LEXATTR ;
isitkeahtes LEXATTR ;
vuorukeahtes LEXATTR ;
historjjákeahtes LEXATTR ;
hearrákeahtes LEXATTR ;
beatnagahtes LEXATTR ;
jeahkálahtes LEXATTR ;
ađđamahtes LEXATTR ;
nissonahtes LEXATTR ;
oallásahtes LEXATTR ;
njuolvves LEXATTR ;
čorgat+Use/Sub:čorgis LEXATTR ; !
geažehis LEXATTR ;
seahkalis LEXATTR ;
oktilis LEXATTR ;
sealggális At ;
sohkenis LEXATTR ;
unnis LEXATTR ;
soidnáris LEXATTR ;
skievttáris LEXATTR ;
viiddisis LEXATTR ;
seakkisis LEXATTR ;
snáh0pis:snáhpisis LEXATTR ;
sálttisis LEXATTR ;
muosvvis LEXATTR ;
šleaiddos LEXATTR ;
láfos LEXATTR ;
buorggos LEXATTR ;
liehmos LEXATTR ;
vierttos LEXATTR ;
umas LEXATTR ;
bás LEXATTR ;
fuorás LEXATTR ;
basakeat LEXATTR ;
čálekeat LEXATTR ;
bážekeat LEXATTR ;
čuođemat LEXATTR ;
visot LEXATTR ;
čabu LEXATTR ;
bonju FINJU- ;
molssu FINJU- ;
bođu FINJU- ;
bieđut:bieđđu LEXATTR ;
dolá LEXATTR ;
diimmá LEXATTR ;
ihtá LEXATTR ;
ievttá LEXATTR ;
ivttá LEXATTR ;
riddo#lagaš LEXATTR ;
goappeš LEXATTR ;
miháš LEXATTR ;
duoláš LEXATTR ;
dassáš LEXATTR ;
ihtáš LEXATTR ;
ievttáš LEXATTR ;
áiggaš:áiggaž LEXATTR ;
jagaš:jagaž LEXATTR ;
cakkas LEXATTR ;
várddus:várddosis LEXATTR ;
albma LEXATTR ;
beitosis LEXATTR ;
eahkedis At ;
heaila At ;
heailla At ;
free^styla At ;
buore At ;
guhkes#áiggi At ;
selggolassii At ;
máŋggašlái At ;
danšlái At ;
čalbmet#beal+Use/Sub:čalbmet#beal At; !
eambbo At ;
geažo At ;
eanas At ;
gaskanas At ;
šláddjás At ;
gallás At ;
bealle#álás At ;
lagat At ;
máŋga#holddet At ;
tullut At ;
rajá#rastá At ;
guovtte#gearddaš At ;
ovtta#guhkkosaš At ;
ovtta#givrosaš At ;
beaivásaš At ;
goassáš At ;
sireráhkaduvvon+Use/Sub:sireráhkaduvvon At; !
sorjankeahtes+Use/Sub:sorjankeahtes LEXATTR; !
čábba+Use/Sub:čábba LEXATTR; ! !SOUTH
čabo+Use/Sub:čabo LEXATTR; ! !SOUTH
unni+Use/NG:una LEXATTR ; ! attr una
čuorre FINJU- ;
luotkko FINJU- ;
jorggo FINJU- ;
jorggu FINJU- ;
galljes+Use/Sub:galljes LEXATTR; ! !This is the Attr. used for gallji
háittis+Use/NG:hájttisis LEXATTR ; !Alt. Attr. form
roa0vis+Use/NG:roaves LEXATTR ; ! irregular attr. form
lossat+Use/NG+Use/NG:los'ses LEXATTR ; ! ad hoc exceptional form
gie0ris+Use/NG:gieres LEXATTR ; !Irregular attr form
čoaskkis+Use/NG:čoaskkes LEXATTR ; ! takes care of irregular attr form
govdat+Use/NG:govdes LEXATTR ; !unusual attr.form
geahppat:gehppes LEXATTR ; !Alt attr.form
knáh0pis+Use/NG:knáhppa LEXATTR ;  !alternating a-attr
rávddis+Use/NG:rávddisis LEXATTR ; !alternating is-attr
oaive#lá0mis+Use/NG:oaive#lámisis LEXATTR ; !alternating is-attr
ittis+Use/NG:ittisis LEXATTR ; !alternating is-attr
čálakeahtes LEXATTR ; ! 11 in nač-corpus, 21 čálekeahtes
veara At ;
ruoŧa At ;
suoma At ;
polska At ;
dáro#giel-sáme#giel At ;
